Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NORTH BRANCH AREA HOCKEY ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the North Branch Area Hockey Association, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the design, construction, and equipping of the Stacy Ice Arena in Chisago County. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end